Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-208
Compulsory attendance; attendance officers; powers and duties; compensation.

School boards shall appoint one or more attendance officers who shall be vested with police powers and shall enforce the provisions of section 79-201 in the school districts for which they act. Attendance officers shall be compensated for their services in such sums as are determined by the school board, to be paid out of the general school fund of the district.

Laws 1901, c. 70, § 2, p. 456;

Laws 1903, c. 95, § 2, p. 552;

Laws 1905, c. 141, § 1, p. 578;

Laws 1909, c. 130, § 1, p. 474;

R.S.1913, § 6925;

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 9, p. 350;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 2, p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 6509;

C.S.1929, § 79-1914;

R.S.1943, § 79-1921;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 16, p. 695;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-210;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 27.

For provisions for attendance officers reporting illegal employment to Department of Labor and county attorneys, see section 48-312.